Massachusetts, session 194th, H3641.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Section 58 of Chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after clause (8) subsection (c) the following new
clause:
(9) That such person attends eight hours of educational training related to the rules,
regulations, and laws pertaining to the used car industry which is provided by an organization
certified by the National Independent Automobile Dealers Association, hereinafter referred to as
NIADA, to provide educational training. NIADA shall establish the minimum core curriculum to
be presented by certified training organizations and establish a standardized test which shall be
administered by all certified educational training organizations to persons attending the
educational training. Said NIADA shall consult with the Massachusetts Independent Automobile
Association in establishing said core curriculum and standardized test. Upon an applicant’s
successful completion of the training and obtaining a passing grade, the organization providing
of 2

the training shall issue a class 2 education certificate to the person. The Class 2 education
certificate shall be developed by the NIADA and include on the face a certificate number. All
certified training organizations shall record the name and certificate number of all certificates
issued to applicants successfully completing the educational training. A municipal licensing
authority shall not issue or renew a Class 2 license unless a class 2 education certificate is
presented to the licensing authority by the Class 2 licensee applicant. All class 2 licensees who
have successfully obtained a class 2 education certificate shall thereafter attend 4 hours of
continuing educational training every two years. Class 2 licensees shall be issued a continuing
education certificate which shall also be a condition precedent to obtaining a class 2 license.
Section 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
of 2